Illinois, session 104th, HB1476.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Criminal Code of 2012 is amended by 5changing Sections 11-9.3 and 11-9.4-1 as follows: 6    (720 ILCS 5/11-9.3)7    Sec. 11-9.3. Presence within school zone by child sex 8offenders prohibited; approaching, contacting, residing with, 9or communicating with a child within certain places by child 10sex offenders prohibited.11    (a) It is unlawful for a child sex offender to knowingly be 12present in any school building, on real property comprising 13any school, or in any conveyance owned, leased, or contracted 14by a school to transport students to or from school or a school 15related activity when persons under the age of 18 are present 16in the building, on the grounds or in the conveyance, unless 17the offender is a parent or guardian of a student attending the 18school and the parent or guardian is: (i) attending a 19conference at the school with school personnel to discuss the 20progress of his or her child academically or socially, (ii) 21participating in child review conferences in which evaluation 22and placement decisions may be made with respect to his or her 23child regarding special education services, or (iii) attending   HB1476- 2 -LRB104 03487 RLC 13510 b1conferences to discuss other student issues concerning his or 2her child such as retention and promotion and notifies the 3principal of the school of his or her presence at the school or 4unless the offender has permission to be present from the 5superintendent or the school board or in the case of a private 6school from the principal. In the case of a public school, if 7permission is granted, the superintendent or school board 8president must inform the principal of the school where the 9sex offender will be present. Notification includes the nature 10of the sex offender's visit and the hours in which the sex 11offender will be present in the school. The sex offender is 12responsible for notifying the principal's office when he or 13she arrives on school property and when he or she departs from 14school property. If the sex offender is to be present in the 15vicinity of children, the sex offender has the duty to remain 16under the direct supervision of a school official.17    (a-5) It is unlawful for a child sex offender to knowingly 18be present within 100 feet of a site posted as a pick-up or 19discharge stop for a conveyance owned, leased, or contracted 20by a school to transport students to or from school or a school 21related activity when one or more persons under the age of 18 22are present at the site. 23    (a-10) It is unlawful for a child sex offender to 24knowingly be present in any public park building, a playground 25or recreation area within any publicly accessible privately 26owned building, or on real property comprising any public park   HB1476- 3 -LRB104 03487 RLC 13510 b1when persons under the age of 18 are present in the building or 2on the grounds and to approach, contact, or communicate with a 3child under 18 years of age, unless the offender is a parent or 4guardian of a person under 18 years of age present in the 5building or on the grounds. 6    (b) It is unlawful for a child sex offender to knowingly 7loiter within 500 feet of a school building or real property 8comprising any school while persons under the age of 18 are 9present in the building or on the grounds, unless the offender 10is a parent or guardian of a student attending the school and 11the parent or guardian is: (i) attending a conference at the 12school with school personnel to discuss the progress of his or 13her child academically or socially, (ii) participating in 14child review conferences in which evaluation and placement 15decisions may be made with respect to his or her child 16regarding special education services, or (iii) attending 17conferences to discuss other student issues concerning his or 18her child such as retention and promotion and notifies the 19principal of the school of his or her presence at the school or 20has permission to be present from the superintendent or the 21school board or in the case of a private school from the 22principal. In the case of a public school, if permission is 23granted, the superintendent or school board president must 24inform the principal of the school where the sex offender will 25be present. Notification includes the nature of the sex 26offender's visit and the hours in which the sex offender will   HB1476- 4 -LRB104 03487 RLC 13510 b1be present in the school. The sex offender is responsible for 2notifying the principal's office when he or she arrives on 3school property and when he or she departs from school 4property. If the sex offender is to be present in the vicinity 5of children, the sex offender has the duty to remain under the 6direct supervision of a school official.7    (b-2) It is unlawful for a child sex offender to knowingly 8loiter on a public way within 500 feet of a public park 9building or real property comprising any public park while 10persons under the age of 18 are present in the building or on 11the grounds and to approach, contact, or communicate with a 12child under 18 years of age, unless the offender is a parent or 13guardian of a person under 18 years of age present in the 14building or on the grounds. 15    (b-5) It is unlawful for a child sex offender to knowingly 16reside within 500 feet of a school building or the real 17property comprising any school that persons under the age of 1818 attend. Nothing in this subsection (b-5) prohibits a child 19sex offender from residing within 500 feet of a school 20building or the real property comprising any school that 21persons under 18 attend if the property is owned by the child 22sex offender and was purchased before July 7, 2000 (the 23effective date of Public Act 91-911).24    (b-10) It is unlawful for a child sex offender to 25knowingly reside within 500 feet of a playground, child care 26institution, day care center, part day child care facility,   HB1476- 5 -LRB104 03487 RLC 13510 b1day care home, group day care home, or a facility providing 2programs or services exclusively directed toward persons under 318 years of age. Nothing in this subsection (b-10) prohibits a 4child sex offender from residing within 500 feet of a 5playground or a facility providing programs or services 6exclusively directed toward persons under 18 years of age if 7the property is owned by the child sex offender and was 8purchased before July 7, 2000. Nothing in this subsection 9(b-10) prohibits a child sex offender from residing within 500 10feet of a child care institution, day care center, or part day 11child care facility if the property is owned by the child sex 12offender and was purchased before June 26, 2006. Nothing in 13this subsection (b-10) prohibits a child sex offender from 14residing within 500 feet of a day care home or group day care 15home if the property is owned by the child sex offender and was 16purchased before August 14, 2008 (the effective date of Public 17Act 95-821). 18    (b-15) It is unlawful for a child sex offender to 19knowingly reside within 500 feet of the victim of the sex 20offense. Nothing in this subsection (b-15) prohibits a child 21sex offender from residing within 500 feet of the victim if the 22property in which the child sex offender resides is owned by 23the child sex offender and was purchased before August 22, 242002. 25    This subsection (b-15) does not apply if the victim of the 26sex offense is 21 years of age or older.   HB1476- 6 -LRB104 03487 RLC 13510 b1    (b-20) It is unlawful for a child sex offender to 2knowingly communicate, other than for a lawful purpose under 3Illinois law, using the Internet or any other digital media, 4with a person under 18 years of age or with a person whom he or 5she believes to be a person under 18 years of age, unless the 6offender is a parent or guardian of the person under 18 years 7of age. 8    (c) It is unlawful for a child sex offender to knowingly 9operate, manage, be employed by, volunteer at, be associated 10with, or knowingly be present at any: (i) facility providing 11programs or services exclusively directed toward persons under 12the age of 18; (ii) day care center; (iii) part day child care 13facility; (iv) child care institution; (v) school providing 14before and after school programs for children under 18 years 15of age; (vi) day care home; or (vii) group day care home. This 16does not prohibit a child sex offender from owning the real 17property upon which the programs or services are offered or 18upon which the day care center, part day child care facility, 19child care institution, or school providing before and after 20school programs for children under 18 years of age is located, 21provided the child sex offender refrains from being present on 22the premises for the hours during which: (1) the programs or 23services are being offered or (2) the day care center, part day 24child care facility, child care institution, or school 25providing before and after school programs for children under 2618 years of age, day care home, or group day care home is   HB1476- 7 -LRB104 03487 RLC 13510 b1operated. 2    (c-2) It is unlawful for a child sex offender to 3participate in a holiday event involving children under 18 4years of age, including but not limited to distributing candy 5or other items to children on Halloween, wearing a Santa Claus 6costume on or preceding Christmas, being employed as a 7department store Santa Claus, or wearing an Easter Bunny 8costume on or preceding Easter. For the purposes of this 9subsection, child sex offender has the meaning as defined in 10this Section, but does not include as a sex offense under 11paragraph (2) of subsection (d) of this Section, the offense 12under subsection (c) of Section 11-1.50 of this Code. This 13subsection does not apply to a child sex offender who is a 14parent or guardian of children under 18 years of age that are 15present in the home and other non-familial minors are not 16present.17    (c-5) It is unlawful for a child sex offender to knowingly 18operate, manage, be employed by, or be associated with any 19carnival, amusement enterprise, or county or State fair when 20persons under the age of 18 are present. 21    (c-6) It is unlawful for a child sex offender who owns and 22resides at residential real estate to knowingly rent any 23residential unit within the same building in which he or she 24resides to a person who is the parent or guardian of a child or 25children under 18 years of age. This subsection shall apply 26only to leases or other rental arrangements entered into after   HB1476- 8 -LRB104 03487 RLC 13510 b1January 1, 2009 (the effective date of Public Act 95-820).2    (c-7) It is unlawful for a child sex offender to knowingly 3offer or provide any programs or services to persons under 18 4years of age in his or her residence or the residence of 5another or in any facility for the purpose of offering or 6providing such programs or services, whether such programs or 7services are offered or provided by contract, agreement, 8arrangement, or on a volunteer basis.9    (c-8) It is unlawful for a child sex offender to knowingly 10operate, whether authorized to do so or not, any of the 11following vehicles: (1) a vehicle which is specifically 12designed, constructed or modified and equipped to be used for 13the retail sale of food or beverages, including but not 14limited to an ice cream truck; (2) an authorized emergency 15vehicle; or (3) a rescue vehicle. 16    (d) Definitions. In this Section:17        (1) "Child sex offender" means any person who:18            (i) has been charged under Illinois law, or any 19        substantially similar federal law or law of another 20        state, with a sex offense set forth in paragraph (2) of 21        this subsection (d) or the attempt to commit an 22        included sex offense, and the victim is a person under 23        18 years of age at the time of the offense; and:24                (A) is convicted of such offense or an attempt 25            to commit such offense; or26                (B) is found not guilty by reason of insanity   HB1476- 9 -LRB104 03487 RLC 13510 b1            of such offense or an attempt to commit such 2            offense; or3                (C) is found not guilty by reason of insanity 4            pursuant to subsection (c) of Section 104-25 of 5            the Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963 of such 6            offense or an attempt to commit such offense; or7                (D) is the subject of a finding not resulting 8            in an acquittal at a hearing conducted pursuant to 9            subsection (a) of Section 104-25 of the Code of 10            Criminal Procedure of 1963 for the alleged 11            commission or attempted commission of such 12            offense; or13                (E) is found not guilty by reason of insanity 14            following a hearing conducted pursuant to a 15            federal law or the law of another state 16            substantially similar to subsection (c) of Section 17            104-25 of the Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963 18            of such offense or of the attempted commission of 19            such offense; or20                (F) is the subject of a finding not resulting 21            in an acquittal at a hearing conducted pursuant to 22            a federal law or the law of another state 23            substantially similar to subsection (a) of Section 24            104-25 of the Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963 25            for the alleged violation or attempted commission 26            of such offense; or  HB1476- 10 -LRB104 03487 RLC 13510 b1            (ii) is certified as a sexually dangerous person 2        pursuant to the Illinois Sexually Dangerous Persons 3        Act, or any substantially similar federal law or the 4        law of another state, when any conduct giving rise to 5        such certification is committed or attempted against a 6        person less than 18 years of age; or7            (iii) is subject to the provisions of Section 2 of 8        the Interstate Agreements on Sexually Dangerous 9        Persons Act.10        Convictions that result from or are connected with the 11    same act, or result from offenses committed at the same 12    time, shall be counted for the purpose of this Section as 13    one conviction. Any conviction set aside pursuant to law 14    is not a conviction for purposes of this Section.15        (2) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (2.5), 16    "sex offense" means:17            (i) A violation of any of the following Sections 18        of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 19        2012: 10-4 (forcible detention), 10-7 (aiding or 20        abetting child abduction under Section 10-5(b)(10)), 21        10-5(b)(10) (child luring), 11-1.40 (predatory 22        criminal sexual assault of a child), 11-6 (indecent 23        solicitation of a child), 11-6.5 (indecent 24        solicitation of an adult), 11-9.1 (sexual exploitation 25        of a child), 11-9.2 (custodial sexual misconduct), 26        11-9.5 (sexual misconduct with a person with a   HB1476- 11 -LRB104 03487 RLC 13510 b1        disability), 11-11 (sexual relations within families), 2        11-14.3(a)(1) (promoting prostitution by advancing 3        prostitution), 11-14.3(a)(2)(A) (promoting 4        prostitution by profiting from prostitution by 5        compelling a person to be a prostitute), 6        11-14.3(a)(2)(C) (promoting prostitution by profiting 7        from prostitution by means other than as described in 8        subparagraphs (A) and (B) of paragraph (2) of 9        subsection (a) of Section 11-14.3), 11-14.4 (promoting 10        juvenile prostitution), 11-18.1 (patronizing a 11        juvenile prostitute), 11-20.1 (child pornography), 12        11-20.1B (aggravated child pornography), 11-21 13        (harmful material), 11-25 (grooming), 11-26 (traveling 14        to meet a minor or traveling to meet a child), 12-33 15        (ritualized abuse of a child), 11-20 (obscenity) (when 16        that offense was committed in any school, on real 17        property comprising any school, in any conveyance 18        owned, leased, or contracted by a school to transport 19        students to or from school or a school related 20        activity, or in a public park), 11-30 (public 21        indecency) (when committed in a school, on real 22        property comprising a school, in any conveyance owned, 23        leased, or contracted by a school to transport 24        students to or from school or a school related 25        activity, or in a public park). An attempt to commit 26        any of these offenses.  HB1476- 12 -LRB104 03487 RLC 13510 b1            (ii) A violation of any of the following Sections 2        of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 3        2012, when the victim is a person under 18 years of 4        age: 11-1.20 (criminal sexual assault), 11-1.30 5        (aggravated criminal sexual assault), 11-1.50 6        (criminal sexual abuse), 11-1.60 (aggravated criminal 7        sexual abuse). An attempt to commit any of these 8        offenses.9            (iii) A violation of any of the following Sections 10        of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 11        2012, when the victim is a person under 18 years of age 12        and the defendant is not a parent of the victim:13            10-1 (kidnapping),14            10-2 (aggravated kidnapping),15            10-3 (unlawful restraint),16            10-3.1 (aggravated unlawful restraint),17            11-9.1(A) (permitting sexual abuse of a child). 18            An attempt to commit any of these offenses.19            (iv) A violation of any former law of this State 20        substantially equivalent to any offense listed in 21        clause (2)(i) or (2)(ii) of subsection (d) of this 22        Section.23        (2.1) "Sex offense" includes a violation or attempted 24    violation of subsection (a), (a-10), or (a-15) of Section 25    26-4 when the violation or attempted violation was 26    committed on or after the effective of this amendatory Act   HB1476- 13 -LRB104 03487 RLC 13510 b1    of the 104th General Assembly and the victim is a person 2    under 18 years of age at the time of the commission of the 3    offense. 4        (2.5) For the purposes of subsections (b-5) and (b-10) 5    only, a sex offense means:6            (i) A violation of any of the following Sections 7        of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 8        2012:9             10-5(b)(10) (child luring), 10-7 (aiding or 10        abetting child abduction under Section 10-5(b)(10)), 11        11-1.40 (predatory criminal sexual assault of a 12        child), 11-6 (indecent solicitation of a child), 13        11-6.5 (indecent solicitation of an adult), 11-9.2 14        (custodial sexual misconduct), 11-9.5 (sexual 15        misconduct with a person with a disability), 11-11 16        (sexual relations within families), 11-14.3(a)(1) 17        (promoting prostitution by advancing prostitution), 18        11-14.3(a)(2)(A) (promoting prostitution by profiting 19        from prostitution by compelling a person to be a 20        prostitute), 11-14.3(a)(2)(C) (promoting prostitution 21        by profiting from prostitution by means other than as 22        described in subparagraphs (A) and (B) of paragraph 23        (2) of subsection (a) of Section 11-14.3), 11-14.4 24        (promoting juvenile prostitution), 11-18.1 25        (patronizing a juvenile prostitute), 11-20.1 (child 26        pornography), 11-20.1B (aggravated child pornography),   HB1476- 14 -LRB104 03487 RLC 13510 b1        11-25 (grooming), 11-26 (traveling to meet a minor or 2        traveling to meet a child), or 12-33 (ritualized abuse 3        of a child). An attempt to commit any of these 4        offenses.5            (ii) A violation of any of the following Sections 6        of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 7        2012, when the victim is a person under 18 years of 8        age: 11-1.20 (criminal sexual assault), 11-1.30 9        (aggravated criminal sexual assault), 11-1.60 10        (aggravated criminal sexual abuse), and subsection (a) 11        of Section 11-1.50 (criminal sexual abuse). An attempt 12        to commit any of these offenses.13            (iii) A violation of any of the following Sections 14        of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 15        2012, when the victim is a person under 18 years of age 16        and the defendant is not a parent of the victim:17            10-1 (kidnapping),18            10-2 (aggravated kidnapping),19            10-3 (unlawful restraint),20            10-3.1 (aggravated unlawful restraint),21            11-9.1(A) (permitting sexual abuse of a child). 22            An attempt to commit any of these offenses.23            (iv) A violation of any former law of this State 24        substantially equivalent to any offense listed in this 25        paragraph (2.5) of this subsection.26        (3) A conviction for an offense of federal law or the   HB1476- 15 -LRB104 03487 RLC 13510 b1    law of another state that is substantially equivalent to 2    any offense listed in paragraph (2) of subsection (d) of 3    this Section shall constitute a conviction for the purpose 4    of this Section. A finding or adjudication as a sexually 5    dangerous person under any federal law or law of another 6    state that is substantially equivalent to the Sexually 7    Dangerous Persons Act shall constitute an adjudication for 8    the purposes of this Section.9        (4) "Authorized emergency vehicle", "rescue vehicle", 10    and "vehicle" have the meanings ascribed to them in 11    Sections 1-105, 1-171.8 and 1-217, respectively, of the 12    Illinois Vehicle Code. 13        (5) "Child care institution" has the meaning ascribed 14    to it in Section 2.06 of the Child Care Act of 1969. 15        (6) "Day care center" has the meaning ascribed to it 16    in Section 2.09 of the Child Care Act of 1969. 17        (7) "Day care home" has the meaning ascribed to it in 18    Section 2.18 of the Child Care Act of 1969.19        (8) "Facility providing programs or services directed 20    towards persons under the age of 18" means any facility 21    providing programs or services exclusively directed 22    towards persons under the age of 18.23        (9) "Group day care home" has the meaning ascribed to 24    it in Section 2.20 of the Child Care Act of 1969. 25        (10) "Internet" has the meaning set forth in Section 26    16-0.1 of this Code.   HB1476- 16 -LRB104 03487 RLC 13510 b1        (11) "Loiter" means:2            (i) Standing, sitting idly, whether or not the 3        person is in a vehicle, or remaining in or around 4        school or public park property.5            (ii) Standing, sitting idly, whether or not the 6        person is in a vehicle, or remaining in or around 7        school or public park property, for the purpose of 8        committing or attempting to commit a sex offense.9            (iii) Entering or remaining in a building in or 10        around school property, other than the offender's 11        residence.12        (12) "Part day child care facility" has the meaning 13    ascribed to it in Section 2.10 of the Child Care Act of 14    1969. 15        (13) "Playground" means a piece of land owned or 16    controlled by a unit of local government that is 17    designated by the unit of local government for use solely 18    or primarily for children's recreation. 19        (14) "Public park" includes a park, forest preserve, 20    bikeway, trail, or conservation area under the 21    jurisdiction of the State or a unit of local government. 22        (15) "School" means a public or private preschool or 23    elementary or secondary school. 24        (16) "School official" means the principal, a teacher, 25    or any other certified employee of the school, the 26    superintendent of schools or a member of the school board.  HB1476- 17 -LRB104 03487 RLC 13510 b1    (e) For the purposes of this Section, the 500 feet 2distance shall be measured from: (1) the edge of the property 3of the school building or the real property comprising the 4school that is closest to the edge of the property of the child 5sex offender's residence or where he or she is loitering, and 6(2) the edge of the property comprising the public park 7building or the real property comprising the public park, 8playground, child care institution, day care center, part day 9child care facility, or facility providing programs or 10services exclusively directed toward persons under 18 years of 11age, or a victim of the sex offense who is under 21 years of 12age, to the edge of the child sex offender's place of residence 13or place where he or she is loitering. 14    (f) Sentence. A person who violates this Section is guilty 15of a Class 4 felony.16(Source: P.A. 102-997, eff. 1-1-23.)  17    (720 ILCS 5/11-9.4-1)18    Sec. 11-9.4-1. Sexual predator and child sex offender; 19presence or loitering in or near public parks prohibited.20    (a) For the purposes of this Section:21        "Child sex offender" has the meaning ascribed to it in 22    subsection (d) of Section 11-9.3 of this Code, including 23    an offense described in paragraph (2.1) of subsection (d) 24    of Section 11-9.3, but does not include as a sex offense 25    under paragraph (2) of subsection (d) of Section 11-9.3,   HB1476- 18 -LRB104 03487 RLC 13510 b1    the offenses under subsections (b) and (c) of Section 2    11-1.50 or subsections (b) and (c) of Section 12-15 of 3    this Code. 4        "Public park" includes a park, forest preserve, 5    bikeway, trail, or conservation area under the 6    jurisdiction of the State or a unit of local government.7        "Loiter" means:8            (i) Standing, sitting idly, whether or not the 9        person is in a vehicle or remaining in or around public 10        park property.11            (ii) Standing, sitting idly, whether or not the 12        person is in a vehicle or remaining in or around public 13        park property, for the purpose of committing or 14        attempting to commit a sex offense.15        "Sexual predator" has the meaning ascribed to it in 16    subsection (E) of Section 2 of the Sex Offender 17    Registration Act. 18    (b) It is unlawful for a sexual predator or a child sex 19offender to knowingly be present in any public park building 20or on real property comprising any public park.21    (c) It is unlawful for a sexual predator or a child sex 22offender to knowingly loiter on a public way within 500 feet of 23a public park building or real property comprising any public 24park. For the purposes of this subsection (c), the 500 feet 25distance shall be measured from the edge of the property 26comprising the public park building or the real property   HB1476- 19 -LRB104 03487 RLC 13510 b1comprising the public park.2    (d) Sentence. A person who violates this Section is guilty 3of a Class A misdemeanor, except that a second or subsequent 4violation is a Class 4 felony.5(Source: P.A. 96-1099, eff. 1-1-11; 97-698, eff. 1-1-13; 697-1109, eff. 1-1-13.) 7    Section 10. The Sex Offender Registration Act is amended 8by changing Section 2 as follows: 9    (730 ILCS 150/2)  (from Ch. 38, par. 222)10    Sec. 2. Definitions. 11    (A) As used in this Article, "sex offender" means any 12person who is:13        (1) charged pursuant to Illinois law, or any 14    substantially similar federal, Uniform Code of Military 15    Justice, sister state, or foreign country law, with a sex 16    offense set forth in subsection (B) of this Section or the 17    attempt to commit an included sex offense, and:18            (a) is convicted of such offense or an attempt to 19        commit such offense; or20            (b) is found not guilty by reason of insanity of 21        such offense or an attempt to commit such offense; or22            (c) is found not guilty by reason of insanity 23        pursuant to Section 104-25(c) of the Code of Criminal 24        Procedure of 1963 of such offense or an attempt to   HB1476- 20 -LRB104 03487 RLC 13510 b1        commit such offense; or2            (d) is the subject of a finding not resulting in an 3        acquittal at a hearing conducted pursuant to Section 4        104-25(a) of the Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963 5        for the alleged commission or attempted commission of 6        such offense; or7            (e) is found not guilty by reason of insanity 8        following a hearing conducted pursuant to a federal, 9        Uniform Code of Military Justice, sister state, or 10        foreign country law substantially similar to Section 11        104-25(c) of the Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963 of 12        such offense or of the attempted commission of such 13        offense; or14            (f) is the subject of a finding not resulting in an 15        acquittal at a hearing conducted pursuant to a 16        federal, Uniform Code of Military Justice, sister 17        state, or foreign country law substantially similar to 18        Section 104-25(a) of the Code of Criminal Procedure of 19        1963 for the alleged violation or attempted commission 20        of such offense; or21        (2) declared as a sexually dangerous person pursuant 22    to the Illinois Sexually Dangerous Persons Act, or any 23    substantially similar federal, Uniform Code of Military 24    Justice, sister state, or foreign country law; or25        (3) subject to the provisions of Section 2 of the 26    Interstate Agreements on Sexually Dangerous Persons Act;   HB1476- 21 -LRB104 03487 RLC 13510 b1    or2        (4) found to be a sexually violent person pursuant to 3    the Sexually Violent Persons Commitment Act or any 4    substantially similar federal, Uniform Code of Military 5    Justice, sister state, or foreign country law; or6        (5) adjudicated a juvenile delinquent as the result of 7    committing or attempting to commit an act which, if 8    committed by an adult, would constitute any of the 9    offenses specified in item (B), (C), or (C-5) of this 10    Section or a violation of any substantially similar 11    federal, Uniform Code of Military Justice, sister state, 12    or foreign country law, or found guilty under Article V of 13    the Juvenile Court Act of 1987 of committing or attempting 14    to commit an act which, if committed by an adult, would 15    constitute any of the offenses specified in item (B), (C), 16    or (C-5) of this Section or a violation of any 17    substantially similar federal, Uniform Code of Military 18    Justice, sister state, or foreign country law.19    Convictions that result from or are connected with the 20same act, or result from offenses committed at the same time, 21shall be counted for the purpose of this Article as one 22conviction. Any conviction set aside pursuant to law is not a 23conviction for purposes of this Article.24     For purposes of this Section, "convicted" shall have the 25same meaning as "adjudicated".26    (B) As used in this Article, "sex offense" means:  HB1476- 22 -LRB104 03487 RLC 13510 b1        (1) A violation of any of the following Sections of 2    the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012:3            11-20.1 (child pornography),4            11-20.1B or 11-20.3 (aggravated child 5        pornography), 6            11-6 (indecent solicitation of a child),7            11-9.1 (sexual exploitation of a child),8            11-9.2 (custodial sexual misconduct), 9            11-9.5 (sexual misconduct with a person with a 10        disability), 11            11-14.4 (promoting juvenile prostitution), 12            11-15.1 (soliciting for a juvenile prostitute),13            11-18.1 (patronizing a juvenile prostitute),14            11-17.1 (keeping a place of juvenile 15        prostitution),16            11-19.1 (juvenile pimping),17            11-19.2 (exploitation of a child), 18            11-25 (grooming), 19            11-26 (traveling to meet a minor or traveling to 20        meet a child), 21            11-1.20 or 12-13 (criminal sexual assault), 22            11-1.30 or 12-14 (aggravated criminal sexual 23        assault),24            11-1.40 or 12-14.1 (predatory criminal sexual 25        assault of a child),26            11-1.50 or 12-15 (criminal sexual abuse),  HB1476- 23 -LRB104 03487 RLC 13510 b1            11-1.60 or 12-16 (aggravated criminal sexual 2        abuse),3            12-33 (ritualized abuse of a child).4            An attempt to commit any of these offenses.5        (1.5) A violation of any of the following Sections of 6    the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, 7    when the victim is a person under 18 years of age, the 8    defendant is not a parent of the victim, the offense was 9    sexually motivated as defined in Section 10 of the Sex 10    Offender Evaluation and Treatment Act, and the offense was 11    committed on or after January 1, 1996:12            10-1 (kidnapping),13            10-2 (aggravated kidnapping),14            10-3 (unlawful restraint),15            10-3.1 (aggravated unlawful restraint).16        If the offense was committed before January 1, 1996, 17    it is a sex offense requiring registration only when the 18    person is convicted of any felony after July 1, 2011, and 19    paragraph (2.1) of subsection (c) of Section 3 of this Act 20    applies. 21        (1.6) First degree murder under Section 9-1 of the 22    Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, 23    provided the offense was sexually motivated as defined in 24    Section 10 of the Sex Offender Management Board Act.25        (1.7) (Blank).26        (1.8) A violation or attempted violation of Section   HB1476- 24 -LRB104 03487 RLC 13510 b1    11-11 (sexual relations within families) of the Criminal 2    Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, and the offense 3    was committed on or after June 1, 1997. If the offense was 4    committed before June 1, 1997, it is a sex offense 5    requiring registration only when the person is convicted 6    of any felony after July 1, 2011, and paragraph (2.1) of 7    subsection (c) of Section 3 of this Act applies. 8        (1.9) Child abduction under paragraph (10) of 9    subsection (b) of Section 10-5 of the Criminal Code of 10    1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012 committed by luring or 11    attempting to lure a child under the age of 16 into a motor 12    vehicle, building, house trailer, or dwelling place 13    without the consent of the parent or lawful custodian of 14    the child for other than a lawful purpose and the offense 15    was committed on or after January 1, 1998, provided the 16    offense was sexually motivated as defined in Section 10 of 17    the Sex Offender Management Board Act. If the offense was 18    committed before January 1, 1998, it is a sex offense 19    requiring registration only when the person is convicted 20    of any felony after July 1, 2011, and paragraph (2.1) of 21    subsection (c) of Section 3 of this Act applies. 22        (1.10) A violation or attempted violation of any of 23    the following Sections of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the 24    Criminal Code of 2012 when the offense was committed on or 25    after July 1, 1999:26            10-4 (forcible detention, if the victim is under   HB1476- 25 -LRB104 03487 RLC 13510 b1        18 years of age), provided the offense was sexually 2        motivated as defined in Section 10 of the Sex Offender 3        Management Board Act,4            11-6.5 (indecent solicitation of an adult),5            11-14.3 that involves soliciting for a prostitute, 6        or 11-15 (soliciting for a prostitute, if the victim 7        is under 18 years of age),8            subdivision (a)(2)(A) or (a)(2)(B) of Section 9        11-14.3, or Section 11-16 (pandering, if the victim is 10        under 18 years of age),11            11-18 (patronizing a prostitute, if the victim is 12        under 18 years of age),13            subdivision (a)(2)(C) of Section 11-14.3, or 14        Section 11-19 (pimping, if the victim is under 18 15        years of age).16        If the offense was committed before July 1, 1999, it 17    is a sex offense requiring registration only when the 18    person is convicted of any felony after July 1, 2011, and 19    paragraph (2.1) of subsection (c) of Section 3 of this Act 20    applies. 21        (1.11) A violation or attempted violation of any of 22    the following Sections of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the 23    Criminal Code of 2012 when the offense was committed on or 24    after August 22, 2002:25            11-9 or 11-30 (public indecency for a third or 26        subsequent conviction).  HB1476- 26 -LRB104 03487 RLC 13510 b1        If the third or subsequent conviction was imposed 2    before August 22, 2002, it is a sex offense requiring 3    registration only when the person is convicted of any 4    felony after July 1, 2011, and paragraph (2.1) of 5    subsection (c) of Section 3 of this Act applies. 6        (1.12) A violation or attempted violation of Section 7    5.1 of the Wrongs to Children Act or Section 11-9.1A of the 8    Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012 9    (permitting sexual abuse) when the offense was committed 10    on or after August 22, 2002. If the offense was committed 11    before August 22, 2002, it is a sex offense requiring 12    registration only when the person is convicted of any 13    felony after July 1, 2011, and paragraph (2.1) of 14    subsection (c) of Section 3 of this Act applies. 15        (1.13) A violation or attempted violation of 16    subsection (a), (a-10), or (a-15) of Section 26-4 of the 17    Criminal Code of 2012 when the violation or attempted 18    violation was committed on or after the effective of this 19    amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly. 20        (2) A violation of any former law of this State 21    substantially equivalent to any offense listed in 22    subsection (B) of this Section.23    (C) A conviction for an offense of federal law, Uniform 24Code of Military Justice, or the law of another state or a 25foreign country that is substantially equivalent to any 26offense listed in subsections (B), (C), (E), and (E-5) of this   HB1476- 27 -LRB104 03487 RLC 13510 b1Section shall constitute a conviction for the purpose of this 2Article. A finding or adjudication as a sexually dangerous 3person or a sexually violent person under any federal law, 4Uniform Code of Military Justice, or the law of another state 5or foreign country that is substantially equivalent to the 6Sexually Dangerous Persons Act or the Sexually Violent Persons 7Commitment Act shall constitute an adjudication for the 8purposes of this Article.9    (C-5) A person at least 17 years of age at the time of the 10commission of the offense who is convicted of first degree 11murder under Section 9-1 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the 12Criminal Code of 2012, against a person under 18 years of age, 13shall be required to register for natural life. A conviction 14for an offense of federal, Uniform Code of Military Justice, 15sister state, or foreign country law that is substantially 16equivalent to any offense listed in subsection (C-5) of this 17Section shall constitute a conviction for the purpose of this 18Article. This subsection (C-5) applies to a person who 19committed the offense before June 1, 1996 if: (i) the person is 20incarcerated in an Illinois Department of Corrections facility 21on August 20, 2004 (the effective date of Public Act 93-977), 22or (ii) subparagraph (i) does not apply and the person is 23convicted of any felony after July 1, 2011, and paragraph 24(2.1) of subsection (c) of Section 3 of this Act applies.25    (C-6) A person who is convicted or adjudicated delinquent 26of first degree murder as defined in Section 9-1 of the   HB1476- 28 -LRB104 03487 RLC 13510 b1Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, against a 2person 18 years of age or over, shall be required to register 3for his or her natural life. A conviction for an offense of 4federal, Uniform Code of Military Justice, sister state, or 5foreign country law that is substantially equivalent to any 6offense listed in subsection (C-6) of this Section shall 7constitute a conviction for the purpose of this Article. This 8subsection (C-6) does not apply to those individuals released 9from incarceration more than 10 years prior to January 1, 2012 10(the effective date of Public Act 97-154). 11    (D) As used in this Article, "law enforcement agency 12having jurisdiction" means the Chief of Police in each of the 13municipalities in which the sex offender expects to reside, 14work, or attend school (1) upon his or her discharge, parole or 15release or (2) during the service of his or her sentence of 16probation or conditional discharge, or the Sheriff of the 17county, in the event no Police Chief exists or if the offender 18intends to reside, work, or attend school in an unincorporated 19area. "Law enforcement agency having jurisdiction" includes 20the location where out-of-state students attend school and 21where out-of-state employees are employed or are otherwise 22required to register.23    (D-1) As used in this Article, "supervising officer" means 24the assigned Illinois Department of Corrections parole agent 25or county probation officer. 26    (E) As used in this Article, "sexual predator" means any   HB1476- 29 -LRB104 03487 RLC 13510 b1person who, after July 1, 1999, is:2        (1) Convicted for an offense of federal, Uniform Code 3    of Military Justice, sister state, or foreign country law 4    that is substantially equivalent to any offense listed in 5    subsection (E) or (E-5) of this Section shall constitute a 6    conviction for the purpose of this Article. Convicted of a 7    violation or attempted violation of any of the following 8    Sections of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code 9    of 2012:10            10-5.1 (luring of a minor),11            11-14.4 that involves keeping a place of juvenile 12        prostitution, or 11-17.1 (keeping a place of juvenile 13        prostitution),14            subdivision (a)(2) or (a)(3) of Section 11-14.4, 15        or Section 11-19.1 (juvenile pimping),16            subdivision (a)(4) of Section 11-14.4, or Section 17        11-19.2 (exploitation of a child),18            11-20.1 (child pornography),19            11-20.1B or 11-20.3 (aggravated child 20        pornography),21            11-1.20 or 12-13 (criminal sexual assault),22            11-1.30 or 12-14 (aggravated criminal sexual 23        assault),24            11-1.40 or 12-14.1 (predatory criminal sexual 25        assault of a child),26            11-1.60 or 12-16 (aggravated criminal sexual   HB1476- 30 -LRB104 03487 RLC 13510 b1        abuse),2            12-33 (ritualized abuse of a child);3        (2) (blank);4        (3) declared as a sexually dangerous person pursuant 5    to the Sexually Dangerous Persons Act or any substantially 6    similar federal, Uniform Code of Military Justice, sister 7    state, or foreign country law;8        (4) found to be a sexually violent person pursuant to 9    the Sexually Violent Persons Commitment Act or any 10    substantially similar federal, Uniform Code of Military 11    Justice, sister state, or foreign country law;12        (5) convicted of a second or subsequent offense which 13    requires registration pursuant to this Act. For purposes 14    of this paragraph (5), "convicted" shall include a 15    conviction under any substantially similar Illinois, 16    federal, Uniform Code of Military Justice, sister state, 17    or foreign country law;18        (6) (blank); or19        (7) if the person was convicted of an offense set 20    forth in this subsection (E) on or before July 1, 1999, the 21    person is a sexual predator for whom registration is 22    required only when the person is convicted of a felony 23    offense after July 1, 2011, and paragraph (2.1) of 24    subsection (c) of Section 3 of this Act applies. 25    (E-5) As used in this Article, "sexual predator" also 26means a person convicted of a violation or attempted violation   HB1476- 31 -LRB104 03487 RLC 13510 b1of any of the following Sections of the Criminal Code of 1961 2or the Criminal Code of 2012: 3        (1) Section 9-1 (first degree murder, when the victim 4    was a person under 18 years of age and the defendant was at 5    least 17 years of age at the time of the commission of the 6    offense, provided the offense was sexually motivated as 7    defined in Section 10 of the Sex Offender Management Board 8    Act);9        (2) Section 11-9.5 (sexual misconduct with a person 10    with a disability);11        (3) when the victim is a person under 18 years of age, 12    the defendant is not a parent of the victim, the offense 13    was sexually motivated as defined in Section 10 of the Sex 14    Offender Management Board Act, and the offense was 15    committed on or after January 1, 1996: (A) Section 10-1 16    (kidnapping), (B) Section 10-2 (aggravated kidnapping), 17    (C) Section 10-3 (unlawful restraint), and (D) Section 18    10-3.1 (aggravated unlawful restraint); and19        (4) Section 10-5(b)(10) (child abduction committed by 20    luring or attempting to lure a child under the age of 16 21    into a motor vehicle, building, house trailer, or dwelling 22    place without the consent of the parent or lawful 23    custodian of the child for other than a lawful purpose and 24    the offense was committed on or after January 1, 1998, 25    provided the offense was sexually motivated as defined in 26    Section 10 of the Sex Offender Management Board Act).  HB1476- 32 -LRB104 03487 RLC 13510 b1    (E-10) As used in this Article, "sexual predator" also 2means a person required to register in another State due to a 3conviction, adjudication or other action of any court 4triggering an obligation to register as a sex offender, sexual 5predator, or substantially similar status under the laws of 6that State. 7    (F) As used in this Article, "out-of-state student" means 8any sex offender, as defined in this Section, or sexual 9predator who is enrolled in Illinois, on a full-time or 10part-time basis, in any public or private educational 11institution, including, but not limited to, any secondary 12school, trade or professional institution, or institution of 13higher learning.14    (G) As used in this Article, "out-of-state employee" means 15any sex offender, as defined in this Section, or sexual 16predator who works in Illinois, regardless of whether the 17individual receives payment for services performed, for a 18period of time of 10 or more days or for an aggregate period of 19time of 30 or more days during any calendar year. Persons who 20operate motor vehicles in the State accrue one day of 21employment time for any portion of a day spent in Illinois.22    (H) As used in this Article, "school" means any public or 23private educational institution, including, but not limited 24to, any elementary or secondary school, trade or professional 25institution, or institution of higher education.26    (I) As used in this Article, "fixed residence" means any   HB1476- 33 -LRB104 03487 RLC 13510 b1and all places that a sex offender resides for an aggregate 2period of time of 5 or more days in a calendar year. 3    (J) As used in this Article, "Internet protocol address" 4means the string of numbers by which a location on the Internet 5is identified by routers or other computers connected to the 6Internet.7(Source: P.A. 100-428, eff. 1-1-18.)